Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1412
Political subdivision; power to lease; with whom; when.

Any public body corporate or political subdivision of the State of Nebraska is hereby empowered to enter into a lease or sublease, as lessee or sublessee, with the State of Nebraska or any municipality relating to any building or other facility which is or has been the subject of an agreement pursuant to the provisions of section 72-1405.

Laws 1974, LB 945, § 4.